District of Columbia statutes.
16-2326

Court costs and expenses.

(a)

If, at the dispositional hearing or thereafter, the Division finds, after due notice and a hearing, that the parent or other person legally obligated to care for and support a child subject to proceedings under this subchapter is financially able to pay, the Division may order him or her to pay all of or part of the costs of —

(1)

physical and mental examinations and treatment of the child ordered by the Division;

(2)

except in neglect cases, a reasonable compensation for the services and related expenses of counsel appointed by the Division to represent the child; and

(3)

in neglect cases, a reasonable compensation for the services and related expenses of counsel appointed by the Division to represent the parent or person.

(b)

Payment under this section shall be made as prescribed by rules of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 537, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 121(a)
Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IV, § 408(a), 409, 24 DCR 3341
1981 Ed., § 16-2326.
1973 Ed., § 16-2326.